apertium-nld-0.2.0/apertium-nld.nld.dix
<pardef n="demulcen/s__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s'</l>        <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ten</l>       <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tens</l>      <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bo/or__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ors</l>       <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ren</l>       <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rens</l>      <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tree__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ën</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ëns</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s'</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="be/ek__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>ek</l>        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eks</l>       <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ken</l>       <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kens</l>      <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="decenni/um__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ums</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a's</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ën</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ëns</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="rune__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="rune__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="we/ek__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>ek</l>        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eks</l>       <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ken</l>       <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kens</l>      <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="miskra/am__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>am</l>        <r>am<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ams</l>       <r>am<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r>am<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mens</l>      <r>am<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ze/et__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r>et<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ten</l>       <r>et<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tens</l>      <r>et<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="violoncell/o__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o's</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i's</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>o's</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>o's'</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="protocol__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>len</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lens</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s'</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="diepvrie/s__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s'</l>        <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zers</l>      <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zers'</l>     <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kim__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mens</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="e__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Santome/es__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es'</l>       <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zen</l>       <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zens</l>      <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="zaaleigena/ar__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ars</l>       <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ren</l>       <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>rens</l>      <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ars</l>       <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ars'</l>      <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="e">               <i>e</i><par n="e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Aragonees">       <i>Aragone</i><par n="Santome/es__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Engelse">         <i>Engelse</i><par n="rune__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Letse">           <i>Letse</i><par n="rune__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Oostenrijkse">    <i>Oostenrijkse</i><par n="rune__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Portugees">       <i>Portuge</i><par n="Santome/es__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Santomees">       <i>Santome</i><par n="Santome/es__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Spaanse">         <i>Spaanse</i><par n="rune__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="aanwezige">       <i>aanwezige</i><par n="rune__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="afvallige">       <i>afvallige</i><par n="rune__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="antioxidans">     <i>antioxidan</i><par n="demulcen/s__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="asteroïde">       <i>asteroïde</i><par n="rune__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Azteek">          <i>Azte</i><par n="we/ek__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="beschermheilige"> <i>beschermheilige</i><par n="rune__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="bibliotheek">     <i>bibliothe</i><par n="be/ek__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="brønstedbase">    <i>brønstedbase</i><par n="rune__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="dam">             <i>dam</i><par n="kim__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="decennium">       <i>decenni</i><par n="decenni/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="demulcens">       <i>demulcen</i><par n="demulcen/s__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="diepvries">       <i>diepvrie</i><par n="diepvrie/s__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="dom">             <i>dom</i><par n="kim__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="gade">            <i>gade</i><par n="rune__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="geneugte">        <i>geneugte</i><par n="rune__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="getrouwe">        <i>getrouwe</i><par n="rune__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="gom">             <i>gom</i><par n="kim__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="groentekraam">    <i>groentekra</i><par n="miskra/am__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="hanenkam">        <i>hanenkam</i><par n="kim__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="hypotheek">       <i>hypothe</i><par n="be/ek__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="jongere">         <i>jongere</i><par n="rune__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="kam">             <i>kam</i><par n="kim__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="klasse">          <i>klasse</i><par n="rune__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="leek">            <i>le</i><par n="we/ek__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="miskraam">        <i>miskra</i><par n="miskra/am__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="mitochondrium">   <i>mitochondri</i><par n="decenni/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="natuurkundige">   <i>natuurkundige</i><par n="rune__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="nomadenstam">     <i>nomadenstam</i><par n="kim__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="ondersteek">      <i>onderste</i><par n="we/ek__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="paalsteek">       <i>paalste</i><par n="we/ek__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="piëdestal">       <i>piëdestal</i><par n="protocol__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="protocol">        <i>protocol</i><par n="protocol__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ram">             <i>ram</i><par n="kim__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="randvoorwaarde">  <i>randvoorwaarde</i><par n="rune__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="rechtsgeleerde">  <i>rechtsgeleerde</i><par n="rune__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="rijkdom">         <i>rijkdom</i><par n="kim__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="rundvlees">       <i>rundvle</i><par n="Santome/es__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="steek">           <i>ste</i><par n="we/ek__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="streek">          <i>stre</i><par n="we/ek__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="stuwdam">         <i>stuwdam</i><par n="kim__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="vermiste">        <i>vermiste</i><par n="rune__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="vertrouwelinge">  <i>vertrouwelinge</i><par n="rune__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="videotheek">      <i>videothe</i><par n="be/ek__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="violoncello">     <i>violoncell</i><par n="violoncell/o__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="viskraam">        <i>viskra</i><par n="miskra/am__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="wervelkolom">     <i>wervelkolom</i><par n="kim__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="zaagsnede">       <i>zaagsnede</i><par n="rune__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="zaaknaam">        <i>zaakna</i><par n="miskra/am__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="zaaleigenaar">    <i>zaaleigena</i><par n="zaaleigena/ar__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="gameet">          <i>game</i><par n="ze/et__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="decreet">         <i>decre</i><par n="ze/et__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="zeet">            <i>ze</i><par n="ze/et__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="zoekende">        <i>zoekende</i><par n="rune__n_f"/></e>
